North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 23. State Education Assistance.
§ 116-209.20.
Public purpose.

No expenditure of funds under this Article shall be made for any purpose other than a public purpose.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11.

§ 116-209.21.
Cooperation of the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina. [Repealed]

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11; c. 1244, s. 14; repealed by 2021-180, s. 8A.4(e), effective November 18, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.22.
Constitutional construction.

The provisions of this Article are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of such court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11.

§ 116-209.23.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

Insofar as the provisions of this Article are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Article shall be controlling, except that no provision of the 1971 amendments to this Article shall apply to scholarships for children of war veterans as set forth in Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, as amended.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11; 2015-241, s. 24.1(s); 2015-268, s. 7.3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes” for “Article 4 of Chapter 165.”

§ 116-209.24.
Parental loans.

Policy. — The General Assembly of North Carolina hereby finds and declares that the making and insuring of loans to the eligible parents of students is fully consistent with and furthers the long established policy of the State to encourage, promote and assist education as more fully set forth in

G.S. 116-201(a)

.

Definitions. — As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Obligations”, “student obligations”, or “student loan obligations” as defined under G.S. 116-201(b)(7) includes, unless the context indicates a contrary intent, parental obligations.

“Parent” means a student’s mother, father, adoptive parent, or legal guardian of the student if such guardian is required by court order to use his or her own financial resources to support that student.

“Parental loans” means loans made or guaranteed by the Authority to a parent of an eligible student.

“Parental obligations” means obligations evidencing loans made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

“Student loans” includes, unless the context indicates a contrary intent, parental loans.

Parental Assistance. — The Authority is authorized to develop and administer programs and perform all functions necessary or convenient to promote and facilitate the making and insuring of loans to parents of students in order to facilitate the vocational and college education of such students who are enrolled or to be enrolled in eligible institutions. The Authority is also authorized to provide such other services and loan assistance to parents of students as the Authority shall deem necessary or desirable for carrying out the purpose of this section and for qualifying for loans, grants, insurance, and other benefits and assistance under any program of the United States now or hereafter authorized fostering loans to eligible parents of students.

Authorization to Buy and Sell Parental Obligations. — The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to buy and sell parental obligations.

Authorization to Issue Bonds. — The Authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bonds or revenue bonds, as such terms are defined in G.S. 116-201(4), in conformity with provisions of this section.

History.

1981, c. 794, s. 1; 1987, c. 227, s. 9.

§ 116-209.25.
Parental Savings Trust Fund.

Policy. — The General Assembly of North Carolina hereby finds and declares that encouraging parents and other interested parties to save for the education expenses of eligible students is fully consistent with and furthers the long-established policy of the State to encourage, promote, and assist education as more fully set forth in

G.S. 116-201(a)

.

Parental Savings Trust Fund. — There is established a parental savings trust fund to be administered by the State Education Assistance Authority to enable qualified parents and other interested parties to save funds to meet the costs of education expenses of eligible students in accordance with section 529 of the Code. For purposes of this section, the term “Code” has the same meaning as defined in

G.S. 105-228.90

.

Contributions to the Trust Funds. — The Authority is authorized to accept, hold, invest, and disburse contributions, and interest earned on such contributions, from qualified parents and other interested parties as trustee of the Parental Savings Trust Fund. The Authority shall hold all contributions to the Parental Savings Trust Fund, and any earnings thereon, in a separate trust fund and shall invest the contributions in accordance with this section. The assets of the Parental Savings Trust Fund shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended solely for the purposes of the trust fund and shall be held in trust for the parents and other interested parties and their designated beneficiaries. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit the Authority from accepting, holding, and investing contributions from persons who reside outside of North Carolina. Neither the contributions to the Parental Savings Trust Fund, nor the earnings thereon, shall be considered State moneys, assets of the State, or State revenue for any purpose.

(c1)

Investments. —

The Authority shall determine an appropriate investment strategy for the Parental Savings Trust Fund. The strategy may include a combination of fixed income assets and preferred or common stocks issued by any company incorporated, or otherwise located within or without the United States, or other appropriate investment instruments to achieve long-term return through a combination of capital appreciation and current income. The Authority may deposit all or any portion of the Parental Savings Trust Fund for investment either with the State Treasurer, or in the individual, common, or collective trust funds of an investment manager or managers that meet the requirements of this subsection. Contributions to the Parental Savings Trust Fund on deposit with the State Treasurer shall be invested by the State Treasurer as authorized in G.S. 147-69.2(b)(1) through (6) and the applicable provisions of

G.S. 147-69.3

. Contributions to the Parental Savings Trust Fund may be invested in the individual, common, or collective trust funds of an investment manager provided that the investment manager meets both of the following conditions:

The investment manager has assets under management of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) at all times.

The investment manager is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

Administration of the Trust Fund. — The Authority is authorized to develop and perform all functions necessary and desirable to administer the Parental Savings Trust Fund and to provide such other services as the Authority shall deem necessary to facilitate participation in the Parental Savings Trust Fund. The Authority is further authorized to obtain the services of such investment advisors or program managers as may be necessary for the proper administration and marketing and investment strategy for the Parental Savings Trust Fund.

Loan Program. — The Authority is authorized to develop and administer a loan program in conjunction with the Parental Savings Trust Fund to provide loan assistance to qualified parents and interested parties in order to facilitate the postsecondary education of eligible students. All funds appropriated to, or otherwise received by the Authority for loans under this section, all funds received as repayment of such loans, and all interest earned on these funds shall be placed in an institutional trust fund. This institutional trust fund may be used only for loans made to qualified parents and interested parties who contributed to the Parental Savings Trust Fund and administrative costs associated with the recovery of funds advanced under this loan program.

Limitations. — Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any obligation of the Authority, the State Treasurer, the State, or any agency or instrumentality of the State to guarantee for the benefit of any parent, other interested party, or designated beneficiary the rate of return or other return for any contribution to the Parental Savings Trust Fund and the payment of interest or other return on any contribution to the Parental Savings Trust Fund.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 16.7; 2000-177, s. 11; 2001-243, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 19; 2018-5, s. 38.1(i).

§ 116-209.26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.2(e), effective July 1, 2010.

History.

2007-323, s. 9.7(a); 2008-107, s. 9.2(a), (b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-107, ss. 9.2(a) and (b), effective July 1, 2008, and applicable for academic years beginning on or after July 1, 2008, made minor grammatical changes in subdivisions (a)(2)a and (a)(2)b, added “any of the following” at the end of subdivision (a)(2)a; added subdivision (a)(2)c; and added subsection (h).

§ 116-209.27.
Administration of scholarships previously awarded by Teaching Fellows Program.

The Authority shall, as of March 1, 2015, administer all outstanding scholarship loans previously awarded by the former North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission and subject to repayment under the former Teaching Fellows Program administered pursuant to Part 2 of Article 24C of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

Scholarship loans previously awarded by the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission by notes payable to the Commission shall be deemed payable to the Authority, as the successor in interest to the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission, by the same terms stated in the note.

All funds received by the Authority in association with its administration of the Teaching Fellows Program, including all funds received as repayment of scholarship loans and all interest earned on these funds, shall be deposited into the Forgivable Education Loans for Service Fund established in

G.S. 116-209.45

.

History.

2014-100, s. 11.10(b); 2017-57, s. 10A.3(g).

Cross References.

As to North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program, see Part 3 of Article 23 of Chapter 116,

G.S. 116-209.60

et seq.

§ 116-209.28.
Administration of scholarships previously awarded by the Principal Fellows Program.

The Authority shall, as of July 1, 2021, administer all outstanding scholarship loans previously awarded by the former North Carolina Principal Fellows Commission and subject to repayment under the former Principal Fellows Program administered pursuant to Article 5C of this Chapter.

All funds received by the Authority in association with its administration of the Principal Fellows Program, including all funds received as repayment of scholarship loans and all interest earned on these funds, shall be deposited into the North Carolina Principal Fellows and TP3 Trust Fund established in

G.S. 116-74.41

B.

History.

2019-60, s. 1(v).

§ 116-209.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 116-209.30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 9(a), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 17.16; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 9(a), effective July 1, 2012.

§§ 116-209.31,
116-209.32.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§§ 116-209.33,
116-209.34.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 7(a), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

116-209.33; 1957, c. 1237; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 10.1; 1987, c. 738, s. 198(b); 1993, c. 260, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 18.10; 1997-506, s. 40; 2005-276, ss. 9.17(b), 9.17(c); repealed by 2011-74, s. 7(a), effective July 1, 2012. 116-209.34; 1957, c. 1237; 1973, c. 581, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 750, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 10.1; 1987, c. 738, ss. 198(c), (d), (e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 95; 1993, c. 260, s. 2; 1995, c. 435, s. 1; 2005-276, ss. 9.17(b), 9.17(d); repealed by 2011-74, s. 7(a), effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-209.35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 8, effective July 1, 2012.

History.

2001-424, s. 31.5(a); 2006-95, s. 2.3; 2007-457, s. 1; repealed by 2011-74, s. 8, effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-209.36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 9.1(a), effective July 1, 2008.

§ 116-209.37.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 116-209.38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

2005-276, s. 9.11(a); 2006-95, s. 2.5; 2007-323, s. 9.9.

§ 116-209.39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 116-209.40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 11.2(d), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

2007-323, s. 9.18(a); repealed by 2013-360, s. 11.2(d), effective July 1, 2013.

§§ 116-209.41 through 116-209.44.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 116-209.45.
Forgivable Education Loans for Service Program and Fund.

Policy. — The General Assembly finds that it is in the public interest to provide financial assistance in the form of forgivable loans for service to qualified students who are committed to working in the State in order to respond to critical employment shortages.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Eligible Institution. — Notwithstanding G.S. 116-201(b)(5) and G.S. 116-201(b)(6) and for purposes of this section only, an institution of higher education that is any of the following:

A postsecondary constituent institution of The University of North Carolina as defined in

G.S. 116-2(4)

.

A community college as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

.

through e. Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.2(a), effective July 1, 2012.

f.

Another public or nonprofit postsecondary institution offering a program of study not otherwise available in North Carolina that is deemed to be eligible under rules promulgated by the Authority.

g.

An eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3).

Fund. — The Forgivable Education Loans for Service Fund.

Loan. — A forgivable loan made under the Program.

Program. — The Forgivable Education Loans for Service Program.

Establish Forgivable Education Loans for Service Program. — There is established the Forgivable Education Loans for Service Program to be administered by the Authority. The purpose of the Program is to facilitate and promote the making, insuring, and collection of loans from the Forgivable Education Loans for Service Fund. The Program shall initially target future teachers, nurses, and allied health professionals.

Establish Forgivable Loans for Service Fund. — There is established the Forgivable Education Loans for Service Fund to be administered by the Authority. The purpose of the Fund is to provide financial assistance to qualified students to enable them to obtain the requisite education beyond the high school level to work in North Carolina in certain high-need professions as identified by the General Assembly and to respond to current as well as future employment shortages in North Carolina.

Eligibility for Loans. — The Authority shall establish the criteria for initial and continuing eligibility to participate in the Program. All loan recipients shall be residents of North Carolina and shall attend an eligible institution.The Authority shall adopt standards deemed appropriate by the Authority to ensure that only qualified, potential recipients receive a loan under the Program. The standards may include minimum grade point average and satisfactory academic progress.

Loan Terms and Conditions. — The following terms and conditions shall apply to each loan made pursuant to this section:

Promissory note. — All loans shall be evidenced by promissory notes made payable to the Authority.

Interest. — All promissory notes shall bear an interest rate established by the Authority that does not exceed ten percent (10%) and is in relation to the current interest rate for nonneed-based federal loans made pursuant to Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended. Interest shall accrue from the date of disbursement of the loan funds.

Loan amount. — The Authority shall establish the amount of the loan based on funds available and factors such as the recipient’s educational program, enrollment status, and field of study.

Repayment. — The Authority shall establish the criteria for loan forgiveness for employment in a designated field in North Carolina. These criteria may provide for accelerated repayment and less than full-time employment options. The Authority shall collect cash repayments when service repayment is not completed. The Authority shall establish the terms for cash repayment, including a minimum monthly repayment amount and maximum period of time to complete repayment.

Death and disability. — The Authority may forgive all or part of a loan if it determines that it is impossible for the recipient to repay the loan in cash or service because of the death or disability of the recipient.

Hardship. — The Authority may grant a forbearance, a deferment, or both in hardship circumstances when a good faith effort has been made to repay the loan in a timely manner.

Other. — The Authority may establish other terms and conditions that are necessary or convenient to effectuate the Program.

Advisory Group. — The Authority shall appoint an advisory group composed of, at minimum, appropriate representatives from higher education institutions and health and labor departments, agencies, or commissions to make recommendations to the Authority regarding the Authority’s future apportionment and distribution of Program loans based on projected labor market shortages, higher education enrollment projections, and other relevant information.

Use of Fund Monies. — All funds appropriated to or otherwise received by the Authority to provide loans through the Program, all funds received as repayment of loans, and all interest earned on these funds shall be placed in the Fund. The Fund shall be used only for loans made pursuant to this section and for administrative costs of the Authority, including costs of administering the former Teaching Fellows Program transferred to the Authority under

G.S. 116-209.27

.

Rule-making Authority. — The Authority may adopt rules necessary to implement, administer, and enforce the provisions of this section.

Report to the General Assembly. — The Authority shall report no later than December 1, 2013, and annually thereafter to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding the Fund and loans awarded from the Fund.

History.

2011-74, s. 1; 2012-142, s. 9.2(a); 2014-100, s. 11.10(g).

§§ 116-209.46 through 116-209.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. North Carolina National Guard Tuition Assistance Act of 1975. [RECODIFIED]

§ 116-209.50.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-190, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 2; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b); recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-190 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§ 116-209.51.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-191, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 3; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b); 2011-183, s. 85; recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-191 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§ 116-209.52.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-192, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 4; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; c. 228, s. 1; 1987, c. 564, s. 24; 2008-94, s. 2; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2015-264, s. 66(a); recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-192 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§ 116-209.53.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-193, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 5; 1977, c. 228, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 99, 100; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 22.3; 2000-67, s. 18; 2005-444, s. 1; 2008-94, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-193 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§ 116-209.54.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-194, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 6; 1977, c. 228, ss. 3, 4; 2008-94, s. 4; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2011-183, s. 86(a), (b); 2015-264, s. 66(b); 2015-298, s. 1; 2017-155, s. 3; recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-194 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§ 116-209.55.
Recodified as G.S. §
127A-195, effective November 18, 2021.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 7; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2005-444, ss. 2, 3; 2008-94, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2011-183, s. 87; 2015-264, s. 66(c); recodified as N.C. Gen. Stat. §
127A-195 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b).

§§ 116-209.56 through 116-209.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.

§ 116-209.60.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

Commission. — The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission.

Director. — The Director of the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.

Forgivable loan. — A forgivable loan made under the Program.

Program. — The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.

Public school. — An elementary or secondary school located in North Carolina that is governed by a local board of education, charter school board of directors, regional school board of directors, or University of North Carolina laboratory school board of trustees.

STEM.— Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

Trust Fund. — The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program Trust Fund.

History.

2017-57, s. 10A.3(a).

Cross References.

As to North Carolina Education Endowment Fund, see Article 32E of Chapter 115C,

G.S. 115C-472.16

.

§ 116-209.61.
North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission established; membership.

Commission Established. — There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission. The Commission shall determine program and forgivable loan recipient selection criteria and selection procedures and shall select the recipients to receive forgivable loans under the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program in accordance with the requirements of this Part. The Director of the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program shall appoint staff to the Commission.

Membership. — The Commission shall consist of 14 members who shall be appointed or serve as ex officio members as follows:

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall appoint seven members to the Commission as follows:

Two deans of approved schools of education at postsecondary constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina.

The president of a North Carolina community college.

A teacher who graduated from an approved educator preparation program located in the State within three years of appointment to serve on the Commission.

A principal who graduated from an approved educator preparation program located in the State.

A local board of education member.

A member to represent business and industry in North Carolina.

The General Assembly shall appoint two members to the Commission in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

as follows:

One dean of an approved school of education at a private postsecondary institution operating in the State upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

One dean of an approved school of education at a private postsecondary institution operating in the State upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

The following five members shall serve as ex officio members to the Commission:

The North Carolina Teacher of the Year.

The North Carolina Principal of the Year.

The North Carolina Superintendent of the Year.

The chair of the Board of the State Education Assistance Authority.

The Director of the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.

Terms of Office. — Appointments to the Commission shall be for two-year terms, expiring on July 1 in odd-numbered years. Members serving ex officio, other than the chair of the Board of the State Education Assistance Authority and Director of the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program, who have otherwise completed their term of service, shall continue to serve on the Commission until July 1, annually.

Vacancies. — Except as otherwise provided, if a vacancy occurs in the membership of the Commission, the appointing authority shall appoint another person meeting the same qualifications to serve for the balance of the unexpired term.

Chair; Meetings. — The Director of the Program shall call the first meeting of the Commission. The Commission members shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from the membership of the Commission to serve one-year terms. The Commission shall meet regularly at times and places deemed necessary by the chair or, in the absence of the chair, by the vice-chair.

Conflict of Interest. — A member of the Commission shall abstain from voting on the selection of an educator preparation program of a postsecondary constituent institution of The University of North Carolina or a private postsecondary institution operating in the State under G.S. 116-209.62(f) if the member is an officer or employee of the institution or sits as a member of the institution’s board of directors.

Expenses. — Commission members shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowances in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

or

G.S. 138-6

, as appropriate.

History.

2017-57, s. 10A.3.

§ 116-209.62.
North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program established; administration.

Program. — There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program to be administered by the System Office of The University of North Carolina, in conjunction with the Authority and the Commission. The purpose of the Program is to recruit, prepare, and support students residing in or attending institutions of higher education located in North Carolina for preparation as highly effective STEM or special education teachers in the State’s public schools. The Program shall be used to provide a forgivable loan to individuals interested in preparing to teach in the public schools of the State in STEM or special education licensure areas.

Trust Fund. — There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program Trust Fund to be administered by the Authority, in conjunction with the System Office of The University of North Carolina. All funds (i) appropriated to, or otherwise received by, the Program for forgivable loans and other Program purposes, (ii) received as repayment of forgivable loans, and (iii) earned as interest on these funds shall be placed in the Trust Fund. The purpose of the Trust Fund is to provide financial assistance to qualified students for completion of teacher education and licensure programs to fill STEM or special education licensure areas in the public schools of the State.

Uses of Monies in the Trust Fund. — The monies in the Trust Fund may be used only for (i) forgivable loans granted under the Program, (ii) administrative costs associated with the Program, including recruitment and recovery of funds advanced under the Program, (iii) mentoring and coaching support to forgivable loan recipients, and (iv) extracurricular enhancement activities of the Program in accordance with the following:

The Authority shall transfer the greater of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) or ten percent (10%) of the available funds from the Trust Fund to the General Administration of The University of North Carolina [University of North Carolina System Office] at the beginning of each fiscal year for the Program’s administrative costs, the salary of the Director of the Program and other Program staff, expenses of the Commission, and to provide the Commission with funds to use for the extracurricular enhancement activities of the Program.

The Authority may use the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated to the Trust Fund each fiscal year for administrative costs associated with the Program.

The Authority shall provide the Commission with up to six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) from the Trust Fund in each fiscal year for the Commission to provide mentoring and coaching support to forgivable loan recipients through the North Carolina New Teacher Support Program in an amount of up to two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200) for each Program recipient. Funds shall be prioritized for teachers serving in North Carolina public schools identified as low-performing under

G.S. 115C-105.37

.

Director of the Program. — The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall appoint a Director of the Program. The Director shall appoint staff to the Commission and shall be responsible for recruitment and coordination of the Program, including proactive, aggressive, and strategic recruitment of potential recipients. Recruitment activities shall include (i) targeting regions of the State with the highest teacher attrition rates and teacher recruitment challenges, (ii) actively engaging with educators, business leaders, experts in human resources, elected officials, and other community leaders throughout the State, and (iii) attracting candidates in STEM and special education licensure areas to the Program. The Director shall report to the President of The University of North Carolina. The Authority shall provide office space and clerical support staff, as necessary, to the Director for the Program.

Student Selection Criteria for Forgivable Loans. — The Commission shall adopt stringent standards for awarding forgivable loans based on multiple measures to ensure that only the strongest applicants receive them, including the following:

Grade point averages.

Performance on relevant career and college readiness assessments.

Experience, accomplishments, and other criteria demonstrating qualities positively correlated with highly effective teachers, including excellent verbal and communication skills.

Demonstrated commitment to serve in a STEM or special education licensure area in North Carolina public schools.

Program Selection Criteria. — The Authority shall administer the Program in cooperation with up to eight institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation programs selected by the Commission that represent a diverse selection of both postsecondary constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and private postsecondary institutions operating in the State. The Commission shall adopt stringent standards for selection of the most effective educator preparation programs, including the following:

Demonstrates high rates of educator effectiveness on value-added models and teacher evaluations, including using performance-based, subject-specific assessment and support systems, such as edTPA or other metrics of evaluating candidate effectiveness that have predictive validity.

Demonstrates measurable impact of prior graduates on student learning, including impact of graduates teaching in STEM or special education licensure areas.

Demonstrates high rates of graduates passing exams required for teacher licensure.

Provides curricular and co-curricular enhancements in leadership, facilitates learning for diverse learners, and promotes community engagement, classroom management, and reflection and assessment.

Requires at least a minor concentration of study in the subject area that the candidate may teach.

Provides early and frequent internship or practical experiences, including the opportunity for participants to perform practicums in diverse school environments.

Is approved by the State Board of Education as an educator preparation program.

Awards of Forgivable Loans. — The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected students to be used at up to eight selected institutions for completion of a program leading to initial teacher licensure as follows:

North Carolina high school seniors. — Forgivable loans of up to four thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($4,125) per semester for up to eight semesters.

Students applying for transfer to a selected educator preparation program at an institution of higher education. — Forgivable loans of up to four thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($4,125) per semester for up to six semesters.

Individuals currently holding a bachelor’s degree seeking preparation for teacher licensure. — Forgivable loans of up to four thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($4,125) per semester for up to four semesters.

Students matriculating at institutions of higher education who are changing to an approved program of study at a selected educator preparation program. — Forgivable loans of up to four thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($4,125) per semester for up to four semesters.Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, the cost of books, and expenses related to obtaining licensure.

Identification of STEM and Special Education Licensure Areas. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall identify and provide to the Commission and the Authority a list of STEM and special education licensure areas and shall annually provide to the Commission the number of available positions in each licensure area relative to the number of current and anticipated teachers in that area of licensure. The Commission shall make the list of STEM and special education licensure areas readily available to applicants.

Administration of Forgivable Loan Awards. — Upon the naming of recipients of the forgivable loans by the Commission, the Commission shall transfer to the Authority its decisions. The Authority, in coordination with the Director, shall perform all of the administrative functions necessary to implement this Part, which functions shall include rule making, disseminating information, acting as a liaison with participating institutions of higher education, implementing forgivable loan agreements, loan monitoring, loan cancelling through service and collection, determining the acceptability of service repayment agreements, enforcing the agreements, and all other functions necessary for the execution, payment, and enforcement of promissory notes required under this Part.

Annual Report. — The Commission, in coordination with the Authority, the Department of Public Instruction, and the selected educator education programs participating in the Program shall report no later than January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding the following:

Forgivable loans awarded from the Trust Fund, including the following:

Demographic information regarding recipients.

Number of recipients by institution of higher education and program.

Information on number of recipients by anticipated STEM and special education licensure area.

Placement and repayment rates, including the following:

Number of graduates who have been employed in a STEM or special education licensure area within two years of program completion.

Number of graduates who accepted employment at a low-performing school identified under

G.S. 115C-105.37

as part of their years of service.

Number of graduates who have elected to do loan repayment and their years of service, if any, prior to beginning loan repayment.

Number of graduates employed in a STEM or special education licensure area who have received an overall rating of at least accomplished and have met expected growth on applicable standards of the teacher evaluation instrument.

Aggregate information on student growth and proficiency in courses taught by graduates who have fulfilled service requirements through employment in a STEM or special education licensure area.

(2a)

Mentoring and coaching support through the North Carolina New Teacher Support Program, including the following:

a.

Number of forgivable loan recipients who received mentoring and coaching support when employed at a low-performing school identified under

G.S. 115C-105.37

.

b.

Number of forgivable loan recipients who received mentoring and coaching support when employed at a school not identified as low-performing under G.S. 115C-105.37.

Selected school outcomes by program, including the following:

Turnover rate for forgivable loan graduates, including the turnover rate for graduates who also received mentoring and coaching support through the North Carolina New Teacher Support Program.

Aggregate information on student growth and proficiency as provided annually by the State Board of Education to the Commission in courses taught by forgivable loan graduates.

Fulfillment rate of forgivable loan graduates.

History.

2017-57, s. 10A.3(a); 2018-5, s. 10A.2(a); 2018-12, s. 9; 2020-56, s. 5(a)-(c).

§ 116-209.63.
Terms of forgivable loans; receipt and disbursement of funds.

Notes. — All forgivable loans shall be evidenced by notes made payable to the Authority that bear interest at a rate not to exceed ten percent (10%) per year as set by the Authority and beginning on the first day of September after the completion of the program leading to teacher licensure or 90 days after graduation, whichever is later. If a forgivable loan is terminated, the note shall be made payable to the Authority 90 days after termination of the forgivable loan. The forgivable loan may be terminated upon the recipient’s withdrawal from the Program or by the recipient’s failure to meet the standards set by the Commission.

Forgiveness. — The Authority shall forgive the loan and any interest accrued on the loan if, within 10 years after graduation from a program leading to teacher licensure, exclusive of any authorized deferment for extenuating circumstances, the recipient serves as a teacher in a STEM or special education licensure area, as provided in G.S. 116-209.62(h), for every year the teacher was awarded the forgivable loan, in any combination of the following:

One year at a North Carolina public school identified as low-performing under

G.S. 115C-105.37

at the time the teacher accepts employment at the school or, if the teacher changes employment during this period, at another school identified as low-performing.

Two years at a North Carolina public school not identified as low-performing under

G.S. 115C-105.37

.The Authority shall also forgive the loan if it finds that it is impossible for the recipient to work for up to eight years, within 10 years after completion of the program leading to teacher licensure, at a North Carolina public school because of the death or permanent disability of the recipient. If the recipient repays the forgivable loan by cash payments, all indebtedness shall be repaid within 10 years after completion of the program leading to teacher licensure supported by the forgivable loan. If the recipient completes a program leading to teacher licensure, payment of principal and interest shall begin no later than the first day of September after the completion of the program. Should a recipient present extenuating circumstances, the Authority may extend the period to repay the loan in cash to no more than a total of 12 years.

History.

2017-57, s. 10A.3(a); 2018-5, s. 10A.2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 10A.2(b), effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “graduation, whichever is later” for “termination of the forgiveable loan, whichever is earlier,” added the second sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “the Program” for “school.”